District of Columbia statutes.
7-221

Fees for vital records and searches.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue regulations that prescribe the fee to be paid for:

(1)

An amendment or correction to a vital record that is not the fault of the Mayor or a District government agency;

(2)

A certified copy of a certificate or record;

(3)

A search of a file or record if no copy is made;

(4)

A copy or information provided for research, statistical, or administrative purposes;

(5)

The processing of adoptions; or

(6)

Issuance of a new certificate of birth.

(b)

The fee collected shall be deposited into the General Fund of the District government.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 22, 28 DCR 3271
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-168, § 2, 37 DCR 4833

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-221.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Vital Records Act of 1981, see Mayor’s Order 2002-13, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 930).